Indiana, session 2026, HB1039.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-6-2-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.55-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) Whenever any state governmental official
or employee, whether elected or appointed, is made a party to a suit,
and the attorney general determines that said suit has arisen out of an
act which such official or employee in good faith believed to be within
the scope of the official's or employee's duties as prescribed by statute
or duly adopted regulation, the attorney general shall defend such
person throughout such action.
(b) Whenever a teacher (as defined in IC 20-18-2-22) is made a
party to a civil suit, and the attorney general determines that the suit
has arisen out of an act that the teacher in good faith believed was
within the scope of the teacher's duties in enforcing discipline policies
developed under IC 20-33-8-12, the attorney general shall defend the
teacher throughout the action.
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


(c) Not later than July 30 of each year, the attorney general, in
consultation with the Indiana education employment relations board
established in IC 20-29-3-1, shall draft and disseminate a letter by
electronic mail to the listed electronic mail address of teachers
providing a summary of the teacher's rights and protections under state
and federal law, including a teacher's rights and protections relating to
the teacher's performance evaluation under IC 20-28-11.5.
(d) The department of education, in consultation with the Indiana
education employment relations board, shall develop a method to
provide the attorney general with the names and electronic mail
addresses of active teachers in Indiana in order for the attorney general
to disseminate the letter described in subsection (c). Names and
electronic mail addresses collected and provided to the attorney general
under this subsection are confidential and excepted from public
disclosure as provided in IC 5-14-3-4.
(e) Whenever a school corporation (as defined in IC 20-26-2-4) is
made a party to a civil suit and the attorney general determines that the
suit has arisen out of an act authorized under IC 20-30-5-0.5 or
IC 20-30-5-4.5, the attorney general shall defend the school corporation
throughout the action.
(f) Whenever a law enforcement officer (as defined in
IC 5-2-18.2-2), governmental body (as defined in IC 5-2-18.2-1), or
postsecondary educational institution (as defined in
IC 5-2-18.2-2.2) is made a party to a civil suit and the attorney
general determines that the suit has arisen out of an act authorized
or required by IC 5-2-18.2, the attorney general shall defend the
law enforcement officer, the governmental body, or the
postsecondary educational institution throughout the action.
(f) (g) As used in this subsection, "bridge authority" refers to the
New Harmony and Wabash River bridge authority established by
IC 8-16-15.5-2. Whenever:
(1) the bridge authority;
(2) a member of the bridge authority;
(3) an officer of the bridge authority; or
(4) an employee of the bridge authority;
is made a party to a civil suit and the attorney general determines that
the suit has arisen out of an act or omission of any person described in
subdivision (1), (2), (3), or (4), that is authorized or required under
IC 8-16-15.5 or any other law, the attorney general shall defend that
person throughout the action.
(g) (h) A determination by the attorney general under subsection (a),
(b), (e), or (f), or (g) shall not be admitted as evidence in the trial of
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


any such civil action for damages.
(h) (i) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive any such
person of the person's right to select counsel of the person's own choice
at the person's own expense.
SECTION 2. IC 5-2-18.2-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter,
"alien" has the meaning set forth in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a).
SECTION 3. IC 5-2-18.2-1.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.7. As used in this chapter,
"immigration detainer request" means a request issued by an
authorized immigration officer to a law enforcement agency to
detain an individual pursuant to 8 CFR 287.7 or any successor
provision or other applicable federal authority.
SECTION 4. IC 5-2-18.2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.265-2017,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A governmental body or a postsecondary
educational institution may not enact or implement an ordinance, a
resolution, a rule, or a policy, whether written or unwritten, that
prohibits or in any way restricts another governmental body or
employee of a governmental body or postsecondary educational
institution, including a law enforcement officer, a state or local official,
or a state or local government employee, from taking the following
actions with regard to information of the citizenship or immigration
status, lawful or unlawful, of an individual:
(1) Communicating or cooperating with federal officials.
(2) Sending to or receiving information from the United States
Department of Homeland Security.
(3) Maintaining information.
(4) Exchanging information with another federal, state, or local
government entity.
(5) Gathering information.
SECTION 5. IC 5-2-18.2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.265-2017,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A governmental body or a postsecondary
educational institution may not engage in policies or practices that in
any way limit or restrict the enforcement of federal immigration laws,
regardless of whether the enforcement related activity is carried
out by a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency, to less than
the full extent permitted by federal law.
SECTION 6. IC 5-2-18.2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.76-2024,
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) If the attorney general determines that
probable cause exists that a governmental body or a postsecondary
educational institution has violated this chapter, the attorney general
shall bring an action to compel the governmental body or
postsecondary educational institution to comply with this chapter and
to seek the relief authorized under subsection (b).
(b) In an action brought under subsection (a), the attorney
general may seek to:
(1) enjoin an act or a practice constituting a violation;
(2) impose a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) for each violation; and
(3) obtain such other relief as is necessary to ensure future
compliance with this chapter.
(c) The attorney general shall transfer all penalties collected
under this chapter to the treasurer of state for deposit in the state
general fund.
SECTION 7. IC 5-2-18.2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.76-2024,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 6. If a court finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that a governmental body or postsecondary educational
institution knowingly or intentionally violated this chapter, the court
shall enjoin the violation and may grant the relief that is authorized
for a violation under section 5(b) of this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 5-2-18.2-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a
governmental body that has custody of an individual who is the
subject of an immigration detainer request shall:
(1) provide to the judge authorized to grant or deny the
individual's release on bail under IC 35-33-8-3.2 notice that
the individual is subject to an immigration detainer request;
(2) record in the individual's case file that the individual is
subject to an immigration detainer request;
(3) comply with all requests made in the immigration detainer
request; and
(4) inform the individual that the individual is being held
pursuant to an immigration detainer request issued by an
authorized immigration officer.
(b) If an individual who is the subject of an immigration
detainer request presents to the governmental body a United States
passport or a birth certificate issued in the United States, the
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


governmental body shall contact the authorized immigration
officer to determine whether the individual is a citizen of the
United States.
(c) A governmental body or an employee of a governmental
body is not criminally or civilly liable for any action taken in
compliance with an immigration detainer request under this
section.
SECTION 9. IC 5-2-18.2-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10. A judge who receives notice under section 9 of
this chapter that an individual is subject to an immigration
detainer request shall ensure that the notice of the immigration
detainer request is recorded in the court's record, regardless of
whether the notice was received before or after a judgment in a
case.
SECTION 10. IC 5-2-18.2-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), a political subdivision (as defined in
IC 4-2-6-1(a)(14)) may not aid, assist, incentivize, or facilitate the
migration of an alien or a class of aliens into Indiana by doing any
of the following:
(1) Using facilities or equipment, including mail and
messaging systems, owned by the political subdivision for the
purpose of aiding, assisting, incentivizing, or facilitating the
migration of an alien or a class of aliens into Indiana.
(2) Making an expenditure of money from a fund controlled
by the political subdivision for the purpose of aiding, assisting,
incentivizing, or facilitating the migration of an alien or a
class of aliens into Indiana.
(3) Using an employee for the purpose of aiding, assisting,
incentivizing, or facilitating the migration of an alien or a
class of aliens into Indiana during the employee's normal
working hours or paid overtime, or otherwise compelling an
employee to aid, assist, incentivize, or facilitate the migration
of an alien or a class of aliens into Indiana.
(b) This section does not prohibit a political subdivision from
doing the following:
(1) Using facilities or equipment, making expenditures from
a fund controlled by the political subdivision, or using an
employee in ways that may aid, assist, incentivize, or attract
the migration of individuals into Indiana when the political
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


subdivision's activities are designed or intended to aid, assist,
incentivize, or facilitate the migration of any and all
individuals into Indiana, regardless of immigration status.
(2) Engaging in an activity described in subsection (a), if the
political subdivision has obtained the prior, written approval
of the family and social services administration to engage in
such activity. An approval granted under this subdivision may
be revoked by the family and social services administration at
any time and expires two (2) years after the date the approval
is granted, unless the family and social services
administration grants an extension of the approval.
(c) The family and social services administration may, in
consultation with the office of the attorney general, grant an
approval or extension described in subsection (b)(2) if the family
and social services administration determines that an activity in
which a political subdivision proposes to engage:
(1) is consistent with the objectives, requirements, and
operation of a plan submitted by the state under 8 U.S.C.
1522(a)(6); and
(2) will advance the interests of the state.
SECTION 11. IC 12-8-1.5-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) Upon the request of a
member of the general assembly or a state officer (as defined in
IC 4-2-6-1(a)(19)), the office of the secretary shall provide:
(1) except as provided in subsection (b), data regarding the
number of individuals in Indiana who:
(A) are not citizens of the United States; and
(B) are enrolled in or receiving benefits under:
(i) IC 12-10-6;
(ii) IC 12-13;
(iii) IC 12-14;
(iv) IC 12-15; or
(v) IC 12-19; and
(2) the immigration status of each individual described in
subdivision (1).
(b) The data described in subsection (a) does not include
individually identifiable health information as defined in 42 U.S.C.
1320d-6.
SECTION 12. IC 16-21-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2011,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. In addition to the report filed under section 3 of
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


this chapter, each hospital shall, not more than one hundred twenty
(120) days after the end of each calendar quarter, file with the state
department, or the state department's designated contractor, inpatient
and outpatient discharge information at the patient level, in a format
prescribed by the state health commissioner, including the following:
(1) The patient's:
(A) length of stay;
(B) diagnoses and surgical procedures performed during the
patient's stay;
(C) date of:
(i) admission;
(ii) discharge; and
(iii) birth;
(D) type of admission;
(E) admission source;
(F) gender;
(G) race;
(H) discharge disposition; and
(I) payor, including:
(i) Medicare;
(ii) Medicaid;
(iii) a local government program;
(iv) commercial insurance;
(v) self-pay; and
(vi) charity care.
(2) The total charge for the patient's stay.
(3) The ZIP code of the patient's residence.
(4) Beginning October 1, 2013, all diagnosed external causes of
injury codes.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2026, in cases where Medicaid is the
patient's payor, the form of identification, if any, used by the
patient when the patient was admitted, including whether the
patient used an Indiana driver's license or identification card,
a temporary Indiana driver's license or identification card, a
driver's license or identification card issued by another state,
a form of identification issued by a foreign government, or no
identification.
SECTION 13. IC 22-5-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 9. Employment of Unauthorized Aliens
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agency" means any state or
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


local administration, agency, authority, board, bureau,
commission, committee, council, department, division, institution,
office, service, or other similar body of government created or
established by law that issues any form of operating authorization
that is used to engage in commerce in Indiana or in a county, city,
town, or township located in Indiana.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "employ" means to engage the
services or labor of an individual for wages or other remuneration,
including to suffer or permit to work.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "employee" means an individual
who is employed by an employer, including an individual who is
suffered or permitted to work.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "employer" means a person,
including an agent, that employs employees in Indiana.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "operating authorization" means
a license, permit, certificate, approval, registration, charter, article
of incorporation, or other form of authorization that is:
(1) issued by an agency; and
(2) used by a person to engage in commerce in Indiana or in
a county, city, town, or township located in Indiana.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "unauthorized alien" has the
meaning set forth in 8 U.S.C. 1324a(h)(3).
Sec. 7. (a) This subsection does not apply to the hiring,
recruitment, or employment of an unauthorized alien that
occurred before July 1, 2026. Except as provided in subsection (c),
it is unlawful for an employer to knowingly or intentionally recruit,
hire, or employ an unauthorized alien in Indiana.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, "reasonable diligence to
confirm the work eligibility of an individual" includes:
(1) utilizing an electronic verification of work authorization
program operated by the United States Department of
Homeland Security to verify the work eligibility of an
employee, except where the circumstances under which the
verification was made would have put a reasonable person on
notice that the verification was unreliable or of limited
reliability; or
(2) engaging in diligence as may be prescribed by the attorney
general through guidance that shall be consistent with
industry standard best practices for confirming work
eligibility.
(c) An employer is not in violation of subsection (a) if the
employer engaged in reasonable diligence to confirm the work
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


eligibility of an individual before recruiting, hiring, or employing
the individual.
Sec. 8. (a) If the attorney general determines that probable
cause exists that an employer has violated section 7 of this chapter
at any point in the preceding three (3) year period or has violated
the terms of its probationary status under section 9(c) of this
chapter, the attorney general is, except as provided in subsection
(b), authorized to bring an action against the employer to enjoin
the violation and for other relief authorized by section 9 of this
chapter.
(b) In the case of an employer that has never previously been
found under section 9 of this chapter to have committed a violation
of section 7 of this chapter and has never previously submitted an
affidavit under subsection (c), the attorney general shall provide
the employer notice of the attorney general's probable cause
determination before the attorney general initiates an action under
subsection (a). If, within fifteen (15) business days of receiving the
attorney general's notice, the employer provides evidence to the
attorney general and the attorney general:
(1) determines that the employer has engaged in reasonable
diligence to confirm the work eligibility of the employer's
employees; and
(2) either:
(A) determines that all the employer's employees are
eligible to work or that the employer has terminated any
unauthorized alien employees; or
(B) the employer submits to the attorney general an
affidavit under subsection (c);
the attorney general may not initiate an action under subsection
(a).
(c) An employer described in subsection (b) that receives notice
of the attorney general's probable cause determination under
subsection (b) may, within fifteen (15) business days of receiving
the notice, submit to the attorney general an affidavit signed by an
authorized representative attesting that the employer has
terminated the employment of any and all unauthorized aliens,
engaged in reasonable diligence to confirm the work eligibility of
all of its employees, and will not knowingly employ any
unauthorized aliens in the future.
Sec. 9. (a) If a court determines by a preponderance of the
evidence that an employer has violated section 7 of this chapter, the
court shall enjoin the violation and shall order the relief provided
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


in subsection (b) or (c), or both, as the court determines
appropriate.
(b) A court may order the following for violations of this
chapter:
(1) In the case of a single violation by an employer that has
never previously been determined to be in violation of section
7 of this chapter, the court may order the suspension of all of
the employer's operating authorization at the location of the
violation for five (5) business days.
(2) In the case of more than one (1) violation by an employer
that has never previously been determined to be in violation
of section 7 of this chapter, the court may order the
suspension of all of the employer's operating authorizations
at the location or locations where the violations occurred for
a period of ten (10) business days.
(3) In the case of one (1) or more violations by an employer
that have previously been determined to be in violation of
section 7 of this chapter, the court may order the suspension
of all of the employer's operating authorizations at the
location or locations where the violation or violations
occurred for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days.
(4) In the case of one (1) or more violations by an employer
previously subject to the penalty provided in subdivision (3),
the court may order the permanent revocation of all of the
employer's operating authorizations at the location or
locations where the violation or violations occurred.
(5) In the case of an employer that:
(A) willfully violated section 7 of this chapter;
(B) committed previous or current violations at three (3) or
more locations at which the employer engages or
previously engaged in commerce; and
(C) has previously been subject to the penalty provided in
subdivision (4);
the court may order the permanent revocation of all of the
employer's operating authorizations in Indiana.
(c) A court may place an employer on probationary status for
a period of between six (6) months to two (2) years. During the
probationary period, the employer shall file with the attorney
general quarterly reports describing the employer's hiring
practices and efforts to comply with section 7 of this chapter and
containing the work eligibility documentation for the employer's
employees. Each report must be accompanied by an affidavit
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


attesting to the report's accuracy.
(d) If a court determines that an employer has violated the
terms of its probationary status under subsection (c), the court
shall order the applicable relief provided in subsection (b).
(e) If an employer does not hold an operating authorization
specific to the location at which a violation occurred, but uses other
operating authorizations at other locations, the court shall, in
ordering the relief provided under subsection (b), suspend or
revoke those other operating authorizations.
Sec. 10. (a) An employer may not discharge or discriminate
against an employee because the employee communicated or
cooperated with the attorney general concerning compliance with
this chapter.
(b) An employee who believes that the employee was discharged
or discriminated against in violation of subsection (a) may, within
thirty (30) calendar days after the violation occurs, file a complaint
with the commissioner of labor. The complaint shall be handled as
provided in IC 22-8-1.1-38.1.
Sec. 11. The suspension or revocation of a license under this
chapter does not relieve an employer from the employer's
obligations to withhold, collect, or pay income tax on wages paid to
employees.
Sec. 12. This chapter shall be enforced without regard to race,
color, or national origin.
SECTION 14. IC 32-30-7-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2018,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "indecent nuisance"
means a:
(1) place in or upon which prostitution (as described in
IC 35-45-4);
(2) public place in or upon which other sexual conduct (as defined
in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5) or sexual intercourse (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-302);
(3) public place in or upon which the fondling of the genitals of
a person; or
(4) public place in or upon which human trafficking (as described
in IC 35-42-3.5-1 through IC 35-42-3.5-1.4);
is conducted, permitted, continued, or exists, and the personal property
and contents used in conducting and maintaining the place for such a
purpose.
SECTION 15. IC 32-30-7-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. (a) If an indecent
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


nuisance exists, a prosecuting official or any resident of the county in
which the indecent nuisance exists may bring an action to abate the
indecent nuisance and to perpetually enjoin the maintenance of the
indecent nuisance.
(b) If a person other than a prosecuting official institutes an action
under this chapter, the complainant shall execute a bond to the person
against whom complaint is made, with good and sufficient surety to be
approved by the court or clerk in a sum of at least one thousand dollars
($1,000) to secure to the party enjoined the damages the party may
sustain if:
(1) the action is wrongfully brought;
(2) the action is not prosecuted to final judgment;
(3) the action is dismissed;
(4) the action is not maintained; or
(5) it is finally decided that the injunction ought not to have been
granted.
The party aggrieved by the issuance of the injunction has recourse
against the bond for all damages suffered, including damages to the
aggrieved party's property, person, or character and including
reasonable attorney's fees incurred in defending the action.
(c) A person who institutes an action and executes a bond may
recover the bond and reasonable attorney's fees incurred in trying the
action if the existence of an indecent nuisance is admitted or
established in an action as provided in this chapter.
(d) If a prosecuting official institutes an action under this chapter (or
IC 34-1-52.5 or IC 34-19-2 before their repeal) and the existence of an
indecent nuisance is admitted or established in the action, the
governmental entity that employs the prosecuting official is entitled to
all investigative costs, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees
incurred by the entity in instituting the action. The fees shall be
deposited in:
(1) the state general fund, if the action is instituted by the attorney
general;
(2) the operating budget of the office of the prosecuting attorney,
if the action is instituted by a prosecuting attorney;
(3) the operating budget of the office of the corporation counsel
or city attorney, if the action is instituted by a corporation counsel
or city attorney; or
(4) the county general fund, if the action is instituted by an
attorney representing the county.
SECTION 16. IC 34-30-2.1-32.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 32.5. IC 5-2-18.2-9 (Concerning
federal immigration detention orders).
SECTION 17. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1039—LS 6367/DI 137